New Jersey, session 222, A1653.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-4) is amended to read as follows: 4.    There is created within the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety the New Jersey State Board of Cosmetology and Hairstyling. The board shall consist of 13 members who are residents of the State, [three] two of whom shall be public members[, two] appointed pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1971, c.60 (C.45:1-2.2) [and one additional public member,] and one of whom shall be a State executive department member appointed pursuant to subsection c. of section 2 of P.L.1971, c.60 (C.45:1-2.2). [Of the remaining nine members, six] Six of the remaining members shall hold practicing licenses issued by the board and shall have been engaged in the practice of [beauty culture, barbering or cosmetology and hairstyling] the profession in which the member was licensed for at least five years prior to their appointments, but shall not have been engaged in the conduct of or teaching at a licensed school of beauty culture or cosmetology and hairstyling, and two shall own or operate a hair braiding shop in this State.  [The remaining one member appointed by the board created by this act shall hold a teacher's license issued by the board and shall have been engaged in the teaching of beauty culture or cosmetology and hairstyling or shall have been involved in the conduct of a licensed school of beauty culture or school of cosmetology and hairstyling in this State for at least five years prior to the appointment] Of the remaining two members, one shall represent public school vocational programs in cosmetology and hairstyling approved by the State Board of Education and one shall represent licensed private schools of cosmetology and hairstyling. (cf: P.L.2018, c.126, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.